Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dr. Tom Coburn
Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 601 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2299 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. "Commissioner" means a person selected by resolution of the
Legislature to represent this state at an Article V convention for
proposing amendments;
2. "Commission" means the resolution or other measure adopted
by the Legislature which sets forth the names of the appointed
commissioners, the scope of their authority, and other instructions;
and
3. "Alternate commissioner" means a person selected to fill a
vacancy in the delegation.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 602 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A commissioner or alternate commissioner to a convention for
proposing amendments held under Article V of the United States
Constitution shall not exceed the scope of his or her authority when
acting as a commissioner or alternate commissioner. A commissioner
or alternate commissioner exceeds the scope of his or her authority
by voting or otherwise acting beyond the authority granted in his or
her commission, as altered by any duly issued subsequent
instructions provided before the vote or other action.
B. A commissioner or alternate commissioner who exceeds the
scope of his or her authority shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
felony.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2299 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 603 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any individual who, while not being privileged by law, knowingly
bribes, threatens, intimidates, or obstructs a commissioner,
alternate commissioner, or a person representing another state in
the capacity of a commissioner or alternate commissioner at a
convention held in this state, in the performance of his or her
duties, or attempts to do so, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
felony.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 21, 2026 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2299 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)